Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-118
Departments; receipts; payment to treasury; expenditures; when authorized.

The gross amount of money received by every department, from whatever source, belonging to or for the use of the state, shall be paid into the state treasury in accordance with section 84-710, without any deduction on account of salaries, fees, costs, charges, expenses, or claims of any description whatever. No money belonging to or for the use of the state shall be expended or applied by any department except in consequence of an appropriation made by law and upon the warrant of the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1919, c. 190, § 19, p. 440;

C.S.1922, § 7260;

C.S.1929, § 81-120;

R.S.1943, § 81-118;

Laws 2021, LB509, § 19.